Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.220

Applicant may demur to answer or countervail it by proof.

On the trial the applicant is not precluded by the answer from any valid objections to its sufficiency, and may countervail it by proof, either in direct denial or by way of avoidance.

[ 1895 c 65 s 22; RRS s 1020.]